Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,204
List of chemicals, defined.

List of chemicals includes each of the following:

(1) A list of the hazardous chemicals for which a material safety data sheet is required under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C. 651 et seq., and regulations promulgated under the act, grouped in categories of health and physical hazards as set forth under the act and regulations promulgated under the act or in such other categories as prescribed under section 311 of Title III;

(2) The chemical name or the common name of each such chemical as provided on the material safety data sheet; and

(3) Any hazardous component of each such chemical as provided on the material safety data sheet.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 14.